Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1054.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Absent voter" is a voter who utilizes the process described defined in section 759.758. (b) "Absent voter ballot" means a ballot that is issued to a voter through the absent voter process. (c) "Ballot container" is defined in section 14a. (d) "Ballot question committee" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.202. (e) "Business day" or "secular day" means a day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. (f) "Change the result of the election" means either of the following: (i) Elect a different candidate. (ii) Result in the opposite outcome for a ballot question. (g) "Clearly observable boundaries" is defined in section 654a. (h) "Common carrier" means a company that transports mail, on reasonable request, on regular routes and at set rates. (i) "Educational institution" means a public or private institution, or a separate school or department of a public or private institution, that is authorized by law or an accrediting body to grant or issue a diploma, degree, certificate, or license, or to grant approval to practice a profession or engage in an enterprise, and includes, but is not limited to, an academy, high school, college, university, community college, junior college, secondary school, extension course, or a business, nursing, professional, secretarial, technical, or vocational school. (j) "Election" means an election or primary election at which 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the electors of this state or of a subdivision of this state choose or nominate by ballot an individual for public office or decide a ballot question lawfully submitted to them. (k) "Election precinct" is defined in section 654. (l) "Fall" state and county conventions and "spring" state and county conventions are assigned meanings in section 596. (m) "General election" or "general November election" means the election held on the November regular election date in an even numbered year. (n) "Identification for election purposes" means, if issued to the individual presenting the card or document and if presented for voting purposes the name on the card or document sufficiently matches the individual's name in the individual's voter registration record so as to accurately identify the individual as the registered elector, or if issued to the individual presenting the card or document and if presented for voter registration purposes, any of the following: (i) An operator's or chauffeur's license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or an enhanced driver license issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (ii) An official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, or an enhanced official state personal identification card issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (iii) A current operator's or chauffeur's license issued by another state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (iv) A current state personal identification card issued by another state. (v) A current state government issued photo identification card. (vi) A current United States passport or federal government issued photo identification card. (vii) A current military photo identification card. (viii) A current tribal photo identification card. (ix) A current photo identification card issued by a local government. (x) A current student photo identification card issued by an educational institution. (o) "Immediate family" means an individual's father, mother, son, daughter, brother, sister, and spouse and a relative of any degree residing in the same household as that individual. Sec. 509aa. (1) A clerk may use change of address information supplied by the United States Postal Service or other reliable information received by the clerk that identifies registered electors whose addresses may have changed as provided in this section. (2) On receipt of reliable information that a registered elector has moved the elector's residence within the city or township, the clerk shall send by forwardable mail all of the following to the elector: (a) A notice that the clerk has received information indicating that the elector has moved the elector's residence within the city or township. (b) A postage prepaid and preaddressed return card on which the elector may verify or correct the address information. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) A notice explaining that, if the address information is correct and the elector has moved the elector's residence within the city or township, the elector should complete and return the card to the clerk with a postmark of 30 days or more before the date of the next election. If the elector has moved the elector's residence within the city or township and does not complete and return the card to the clerk with a postmark of 30 days or more before the date of the next election, the elector will be required to vote in the elector's former precinct of residence in the city or township. The elector will also be required to submit an address correction before being permitted to vote. (3) On the receipt of reliable information that a registered elector has moved the elector's residence to another city or township, the clerk shall send by forwardable mail all of the following to the elector: (a) A notice that the clerk has received information indicating that the elector has moved the elector's residence to another city or township. (b) A postage prepaid and preaddressed return card on which the elector may verify or correct the address information. (c) A notice containing all of the following information: (i) If the address information is incorrect and the elector has not moved to another city or township and wishes to remain registered to vote, the elector should complete and return the card to the clerk with a postmark of 30 days or more before the date of the next election. If the card is not completed and returned with a postmark of 30 days or more before the date of the next election, the elector may be required to affirm the elector's current address before being permitted to vote. Further, if the elector does not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vote in an election within the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the first business day immediately following the second November general election that is held after the date on the notice, the registration of the elector will be canceled and the elector's name will be removed from the registration record of that city or township. (ii) If the elector has moved the elector's residence to another city or township, information on how the elector can become registered to vote at the next election in the elector's new city or township. (4) If a notice sent under subsection (2) or (3) is returned to the clerk by the post office as undeliverable, the clerk shall identify the registration record of an elector as challenged as provided in this act. The clerk shall instruct the board of election inspectors to challenge that elector at the first election at which the elector appears to vote. If in response to the challenge the elector indicates that the elector resides at the registration address or has changed addresses within the city or township, the elector must be permitted to vote a regular ballot rather than a challenged ballot. The elector shall complete a change of address form at the polling place, if applicable. If the elector does not appear to vote in an election within the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the first business day immediately following the second November general election that is held after the date of the notice, the clerk shall cancel the registration of the elector and remove the elector's name from the registration record of the city or township. (5) If the department of state receives notice that a registered elector has moved out of state by receiving a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 surrendered Michigan driver license of that registered elector, the secretary of state shall send by forwardable mail all of the following to the elector: (a) A notice that the secretary of state has received information indicating that the elector has moved the elector's residence to another state. (b) A postage prepaid and preaddressed return card on which the elector may verify or correct the address information. (c) A notice providing that if the address information is incorrect and the elector has not moved to another state and wishes to remain registered to vote, the elector should complete and return the card to the secretary of state with a postmark of 30 days or more before the date of the next election. If the card is not completed and returned with a postmark of 30 days or more before the date of the next election, the elector may be required to affirm the elector's current address before being permitted to vote. Further, if the elector does not vote in an election within the period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the first business day immediately following the second November general election that is held after the date on the notice, the registration of the elector will be canceled and the elector's name will be removed from the qualified voter file. (6) A notice sent to an elector under subsection (2), (3), or (5) must include a warning to the elector that any prior absent voter ballot application submitted by the elector for all future elections is rescinded and the elector will not be sent an absent voter ballot for any future elections unless the elector submits a new absent voter ballot application. Sec. 758. (1) For the purposes of this act, "absent voter" 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 means a qualified and registered elector who meets 1 or more of the following requirements: (a) On account of physical disability, cannot without another's assistance attend the polls on the day of an election. (b) On account of the tenets of the elector's religion, cannot attend the polls on the day of an election. (c) Cannot attend the polls on the day of an election in the precinct in which the elector resides because of being an election precinct inspector in another precinct. (d) Is 60 years of age or older. (e) Is absent or expects to be absent from the township or city in which the elector resides during the entire period the polls are open for voting on the day of an election. (f) Cannot attend the polls on election day because of being confined in jail awaiting arraignment or trial. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to an individual who has moved outside of this state, regardless of the length of the individual's residence outside of this state, and who no longer maintains an actual residence in this state. The storage of personal effects or household goods, the ownership of property that is rented or leased to others, or occasional brief visits to a former domicile in this state while residing outside of this state for most of the year do not constitute a residence for voting purposes in this state, except for each of the following: (a) An individual described in section 1 of article II of the state constitution of 1963 and statutes enacted under that section. (b) An individual described in section 759a. Sec. 759. (1) A registered elector who qualifies to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, may apply for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 an absent voter ballot in any of the following ways: (a) By a written request signed by the elector stating the statutory grounds for making the application. (b) On an absent voter ballot application form as provided for in this section. (c) On a federal postcard application. (d) Using an online absent voter ballot application as provided by the secretary of state. (2) A registered elector who qualifies to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, may submit an absent voter ballot application in any of the following ways: (a) By mail or email to the clerk of the city or township in which the elector resides. (b) By using the online absent voter ballot application as provided by the secretary of state. (c) Until 4 p.m. on the day before election day, in person to the clerk of the city or township in which the elector resides. (d) On election day, in person until 8 p.m. to the clerk of the city or township in which the elector resides, but only if the elector is registering to vote or updating the elector's voter registration address. An elector who submits an absent voter ballot application under this subdivision must complete the elector's absent voter ballot in the city or township clerk's office. (3) An elector must sign the absent voter ballot application. The digital image of an elector's signature from a Michigan driver license or official Michigan personal identification card record, or an electronic image of an elector's physical signature, is an acceptable signature for the absent voter ballot application. An absent voter ballot application that is submitted and missing a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 signature is subject to the requirements of sections 761 and 766a. (4) An absent voter ballot application submitted before a primary election may be for either that primary election only, or for that primary election and for each election that follows the primary election in that year. An absent voter ballot application submitted before a presidential primary election may be for that presidential primary election only, or for that presidential primary election and for each election that follows the presidential primary election in that year. (5) A registered elector has the right to have an absent voter ballot sent to that elector before each election by submitting a single, signed absent voter ballot application that covers all future elections. (5) (6) An individual may submit a voter registration application and an absent voter ballot application at the same time. Immediately after the voter registration application for that individual is approved, the clerk must verify the absent voter ballot application and issue an absent voter ballot to that individual as provided under section 761. (6) An individual who submits a voter registration application and an absent voter ballot application at the same time and in person on the day of an election must vote the absent voter ballot at the city or township clerk's office. (7) The clerk of a city or township shall have absent voter ballot application forms available in the clerk's office at all times. The clerk of a city or township shall provide an absent voter ballot application form to an individual on a verbal or written request and provide the application to the individual in person, electronically, or by United States mail, postage prepaid 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with a postage prepaid return envelope, as requested by the individual. In addition, the secretary of state, or any county, city, or township clerk, may provide an absent voter ballot application to a registered elector in person, electronically, or by United States mail, with prepaid return postage, without a request from that registered elector. The absent voter ballot application must be in substantially the following form: "Application for absent voter ballot for: [ ] The primary election to be held on ___________________ (Date). [ ] The election to be held on _______ (Date). [ ] All future elections. Automatically send me an absent voter ballot for each election. (Check applicable election or elections) I, .................................. , am a United States citizen and a registered elector of the township of ............ or of the city of .................................. , in the county of .................................. and state of Michigan, and I apply for an absent voter ballot to be voted by me at the election or elections as requested in this application. The statutory grounds on which I base my request are: [ ] I expect to be absent from the community in which I am registered for the entire time the polls are open on election day. [ ] I am physically unable to attend the polls without the assistance of another. [ ] I cannot attend the polls because of the tenets of my religion. [ ] I have been appointed an election precinct inspector in a precinct other than the precinct where I reside. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 [ ] I am 60 years of age or older. [ ] I cannot attend the polls because I am confined to jail awaiting arraignment or trial. (Check applicable reason) Send my absent voter ballot to me at the following address: ........................................... (Street No. or R.R. or Designated Address) ........................................... (Post Office) (State) (Zip Code) My registration address is ...................................... (Street No. or R.R. or Participant Identification Number) ...................................... (Post Office) (State) (Zip Code) Telephone number: Email address: Date........................................................ I certify that I am a United States citizen and that the statements in this absent voter ballot application are true. ...................................... (Signature) WARNING You must be a United States citizen to vote. If you are not a United States citizen, you will not be issued an absent voter ballot. An individual making a false statement in this absent voter ballot application is guilty of a misdemeanor. It is a violation of Michigan election law for an individual other than those listed in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the instructions to return, offer to return, agree to return, or solicit to return your absent voter ballot application to the clerk. An assistant authorized by the clerk who receives absent voter ballot applications at a location other than the clerk's office must have credentials signed by the clerk. Ask to see the individual's credentials before entrusting your application with an individual claiming to have the clerk's authorization to return your application. Certificate of Authorized Registered Elector Returning Absent Voter Ballot Application I certify that my name is .................... and my address is .................... ; that I am delivering the absent voter ballot application of .................... at the applicant's request; that I did not solicit or request to return the application; that I have not made any markings on the application; that I have not altered the application in any way; that I have not influenced the applicant; and that I am aware that a false statement in this certificate is a violation of Michigan election law. _________________ _________________________________________ (Date) (Signature)" (8) The following instructions for an applicant for an absent voter ballot must be included with each application furnished an applicant: INSTRUCTIONS FOR APPLICANTS FOR ABSENT VOTER BALLOTS Step 1. After completely filling out the application, sign and date the application in the place designated. Your signature must appear on the application or you may not receive an absent voter 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 ballot. Step 2. Deliver the application by 1 of the following methods: (a) Place the application in the postage prepaid return envelope provided by the clerk and addressed to the clerk, or place the application in another envelope that is addressed to the appropriate clerk and place the necessary postage on that return envelope, and deposit the return envelope in the United States mail or with another postal service, express mail service, parcel post service, or common carrier. (b) Deliver the application personally to the clerk's office, to the clerk, or to an authorized assistant of the clerk. (c) In either (a) or (b), a member of the immediate family of the voter including a father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, grandparent, or grandchild or an individual residing in the elector's household may mail or deliver the application to the clerk for the applicant. (d) If an applicant cannot return the application in any of the above methods, the applicant may select any registered elector to return the application. The individual returning the application must sign and return the certificate at the bottom of the application. (e) If the applicant applies using the online absent voter ballot application as provided by the secretary of state, send the application electronically through the qualified voter file to the appropriate city or township clerk for processing. (9) For a presidential primary election, the secretary of state shall revise the absent voter ballot application form described in subsection (7) or provide a separate form to require that a presidential primary elector indicate a political party 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 ballot selection when requesting an absent voter ballot. and provide a separate form for a presidential primary elector who has previously applied for an absent voter ballot to indicate or change a political party ballot selection. (10) An elector may request delivery of the elector's absent voter ballot to an address that is not the elector's registration address. In addition, an elector may request delivery of the elector's absent voter ballot to a post office box if the post office box is where the absent voter normally receives personal mail, and the elector does not receive mail at the elector's registration address. (11) An individual shall not be in possession of a signed absent voter ballot application except for the applicant, a member of the applicant's immediate family, an individual residing in the applicant's household, an individual whose job normally includes the handling of mail, but only during the course of the individual's employment, a registered elector requested by the applicant to return the application, or a clerk, assistant of the clerk, or other authorized election official. A registered elector who is requested by the applicant to return the applicant's absent voter ballot application shall sign the certificate on the absent voter ballot application. (12) An individual who prints and distributes absent voter ballot applications shall print on the application the warning, certificate of authorized registered elector returning absent voter ballot application, and instructions required by this section. (13) An individual who makes a false statement in an absent voter ballot application is guilty of a misdemeanor. An individual who forges a signature on an absent voter ballot application is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 guilty of a felony. An individual who is not authorized in this act and who both distributes absent voter ballot applications to absent voters and returns those absent voter ballot applications to a clerk or assistant of the clerk is guilty of a misdemeanor. (14) The absent voter ballot application of an elector who is a program participant, as that term is defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853, is confidential and not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (15) The secretary of state shall provide and maintain an online absent voter ballot application that allows a qualified and registered elector who qualifies to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, to request an absent voter ballot for an election occurring in that elector's city or township. The online absent voter ballot application must be in substantially the same form as the absent voter ballot application provided under subsection (7). (16) The online absent voter ballot application provided and maintained by the secretary of state under subsection (15) must provide an opportunity for an elector to use the elector's stored digital signature on file with the secretary of state on the online absent voter ballot application. In order to allow an elector to use the elector's stored digital signature, the online absent voter ballot application must verify the elector's identity and registration status by requesting the elector's name, complete driver license or state personal identification card number, full date of birth, last 4 digits of the elector's Social Security number, and eye color. A registered elector whose stored digital signature is on file with the secretary of state must sign the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 online absent voter ballot application with that stored digital signature. A registered elector without a stored digital signature on file with the secretary of state may provide a manual digital signature by uploading a photograph of the registered elector's physical handwritten signature to the online absent voter ballot application. A completed online absent voter ballot application, including digital signature, must be sent electronically through the qualified voter file to the appropriate city or township clerk for processing. An online absent voter ballot application signed using a stored digital signature or manual digital signature must be processed and treated identically as an absent voter ballot application signed with a physical handwritten signature. As used in this subsection: (a) "Manual digital signature" means a digitally captured image of an elector's handwritten signature. (b) "Stored digital signature" means the image of a registered elector's signature captured by the department of state and maintained in the department of state's motor vehicle database. Sec. 759a. (1) An absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter who is not registered, but possessed the qualifications of an elector under section 492, may apply for registration by using the federal postcard application. The department of state, bureau of elections, is responsible for disseminating information on the procedures for registering and voting to an absent uniformed services voter and an overseas voter. (2) Upon the request of an absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter, the clerk of a county, city, or township shall electronically transmit a blank voter registration application or blank absent voter ballot application to the voter. The clerk of a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 county, city, or township shall accept a completed voter registration application or completed absent voter ballot application electronically transmitted by an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter. A voter registration application or absent voter ballot application submitted by an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter must contain the signature of the voter. (3) A spouse or dependent of an overseas voter who is a citizen of the United States, is accompanying that overseas voter, and is not a qualified and registered elector anywhere else in the United States, may apply for an absent voter ballot even though the spouse or dependent is not a qualified elector of a city or township of this state. (4) An absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter, whether or not registered to vote, may apply for an absent voter ballot. Upon receipt of an application for an absent voter ballot under this section that complies with this act, a county, city, or township clerk shall forward to the applicant the absent voter ballots requested, the forms necessary for registration, and instructions for completing the forms. If the ballots are not yet available at the time of receipt of the application, the clerk shall immediately forward to the applicant the registration forms and instructions, and forward the ballots as soon as they are available. If a federal postcard application or an application from the official United States Department of Defense website is filed, the clerk shall accept the federal postcard application or the application from the official United States Department of Defense website as the registration application and shall not send any additional registration forms to the applicant. Subject to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection (18), if the ballots and registration forms are received before the close of the polls on election day and if the registration complies with the requirements of this act, the absent voter ballots must be delivered to the proper election board to be tabulated. If the registration does not comply with the requirements of this act, the clerk shall retain the absent voter ballots until the expiration of the time that the voted ballots must be kept and shall then destroy the ballots without opening the envelope. The clerk may retain registration forms completed under this section in a separate file. The address in this state shown on a registration form is the residence of the registrant. (5) Not later than 45 days before an election, a county, city, or township clerk shall electronically transmit or mail as appropriate an absent voter ballot to each absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter who applied for an absent voter ballot 45 days or more before the election. (6) Upon the request of an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter, the clerk of a county, city, or township shall electronically transmit an absent voter ballot to the voter. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the voter shall print the absent voter ballot and return the voted ballot by mail to the appropriate clerk. Subject to subsection (17), beginning September 1, 2025, a member of a uniformed service on active duty, by reason of being on active duty, or a member of the merchant marine, by reason of service in the merchant marine, who is absent from the United States and does not expect to return to the residence where the member is otherwise qualified to vote before an election may electronically return a voted ballot to the appropriate city or township clerk to be counted under the rules promulgated by the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 secretary of state as set forth in subsection (17). (7) The secretary of state shall prescribe electronic absent voter ballot formats and electronic absent voter ballot transmission methods. Each county, city, or township clerk shall employ the prescribed electronic ballot formats to fulfill an absent voter ballot request received from an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter who wishes to receive an absent voter ballot through an electronic transmission. The secretary of state shall establish procedures to implement the requirements in this section and for the processing of a marked absent voter ballot returned by an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter who obtained an absent voter ballot through an electronic transmission. (8) The secretary of state shall modify the printed statement provided under section 761(4) and the absent voter ballot instructions provided under section 764a as appropriate to accommodate the procedures developed for electronically transmitting an absent voter ballot to an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter. A statement must be included in the certificate signed by the absent voter who obtained an absent voter ballot through an electronic transmission that the secrecy of the absent voter ballot may be compromised during the duplication process. The absent voter ballot instructions provided to an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter must include the proper procedures for returning the absent voter ballot to the appropriate clerk. (9) The size of a precinct must not be determined by registration forms completed under this section. (10) An absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 who submits an absent voter ballot application is eligible to vote as an absent voter in any local, state, or federal election occurring in the calendar year in which the election is held for that ballot requested if the absent voter ballot application is received by the county, city, or township clerk not later than 2 p.m. of the Saturday before the election. A village clerk receiving an absent voter ballot application from an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter shall transmit to the township clerk and the school district election coordinators, where applicable, the necessary information to enable the city or township clerk and school district election coordinators to forward an absent voter ballot for each applicable election in that calendar year to the absent voter. If the local elections official rejects a voter registration application or absent voter ballot application submitted by an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter, the election official shall notify the voter of the rejection. (11) An email address provided by an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter for the purposes of this section is confidential and exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (12) Under the uniformed and overseas citizens absentee voting act, the state director of elections shall approve a ballot form and registration procedures for absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters. (13) An absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter may use the federal write-in absentee ballot, in accordance with the provisions of the uniformed and overseas citizens absentee voting act, at a regular election or special election to vote for a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 local, state, or federal office or on a ballot question. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter who uses the federal write-in absentee ballot shall return the voter's voted federal write-in absentee ballot by mail to the appropriate clerk. Subject to subsection (17), beginning September 1, 2025, a member of a uniformed service on active duty, by reason of being on active duty, or a member of the merchant marine, by reason of service in the merchant marine, who is absent from the United States and does not expect to return to the residence where the member is otherwise qualified to vote before an election may electronically return a voted ballot to the appropriate city or township clerk to be counted under the rules promulgated by the secretary of state as set forth in subsection (17). The state bureau of elections shall do both of the following: (a) Make the ballot format for each election available to absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters by email or on an internet website maintained by the department of state. (b) Make the ballot information, including the offices, names of candidates, and ballot proposals, for each election available to absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters on an internet website maintained by the department of state. (14) The clerk of a city or township shall submit to the county clerk of the county in which that city or township is located a written statement no later than 45 days before each election indicating whether absent voter ballots were issued to absent uniformed services voters or overseas voters in compliance with this section and the uniformed and overseas citizens absentee voting act. The city or township clerk shall provide to the county clerk a written explanation describing remedial actions taken by 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the city or township clerk if the city or township clerk fails to comply with this section and the uniformed and overseas citizens absentee voting act. Not later than 42 days before each election, each county clerk shall submit to the state bureau of elections a written report compiled from the written statements submitted by the city and township clerks. The written report must identify the cities and townships that complied with the 45-day deadline under this subsection, the cities and townships that did not comply with the 45-day deadline under this subsection, but provided a written explanation, and those cities and townships that did not comply with the 45-day deadline under this subsection and that did not provide a written explanation. The state bureau of elections may require the clerk of a city or township that did not comply with the 45-day deadline under this subsection, but provided a written explanation, to provide additional information. The state bureau of elections shall require the clerk of a city or township that did not comply with the 45-day deadline and that did not provide a written explanation to file a written explanation, describing the remedial actions taken by the city or township clerk, within 1 business day after the state bureau of elections notifies the clerk of that city or township. (15) For a presidential primary election, the secretary of state shall prescribe procedures for contacting an elector who is an absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter, as described in this section, and who is eligible to receive an absent voter ballot or who applies for an absent voter ballot for the presidential primary election, offering the elector the opportunity to select a political party ballot for the presidential primary election. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (16) The secretary of state shall order a city or township clerk to extend the ballot receipt deadline for any absent voter ballots under this section that were not transmitted to an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter in compliance with subsection (5). The extension must equal the total number of days beyond the deadline as provided in subsection (5) that the city or township clerk transmitted the requested absent voter ballots. These absent voter ballots received during the extension time must be counted and tabulated for the final results of the election provided that the absent voter ballots are executed and sent by the close of the polls on election day. The election may be formally certified before the end of the extension time if the number of outstanding absent voter ballots under this subsection will not alter the outcome of the election. (17) The secretary of state shall promulgate rules that establish policies and procedures for the electronic return of voted ballots by eligible members. In promulgating rules that establish the policies and procedures for the electronic return of voted ballots by eligible members, the secretary of state shall require an eligible member to use a United States Department of Defense verified electronic signature, as that term is defined in section 18a, so that the identity of the eligible member can be verified utilizing those policies and procedures. A member who is unable or unwilling to provide a United States Department of Defense verified electronic signature is not eligible to electronically return a voted ballot. The secretary of state shall take reasonable steps to ensure the integrity and secrecy of voted ballots returned electronically. The secretary of state may develop and maintain a secure web portal on the secretary of state's 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 website to facilitate the electronic return of voted ballots by eligible members. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's duly authorized agent, a city or township clerk, the clerk's deputy clerk, or a sworn member of the clerk's staff is authorized to access the secure web portal on the secretary of state's website. No later than September 1, 2025, the secretary of state shall promulgate rules pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to implement this subsection. As used in this subsection, "eligible member" means a member of a uniformed service on active duty or a member of the merchant marine, as described in subsection (6) or (13). (18) If the absent voter ballot return envelope containing a marked absent voter ballot for an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter is postmarked on or before election day and the absent voter ballot is received by mail by the city or township clerk within 6 days after the election, the city or township clerk shall consider that absent voter ballot timely received. If the absent voter ballot return envelope containing a marked absent voter ballot for an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter is received by mail by the city or township clerk within 6 days after the election and the postmark on the absent voter ballot return envelope is missing or unclear, the city or township clerk shall deliver that absent voter ballot return envelope to the clerk of the county in which the city or township is located as provided in this subsection and that county clerk shall determine whether that absent voter ballot was timely received. Not later than the seventh day after election day, each city or township clerk shall, without opening the absent voter ballot return envelopes, deliver 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the absent voter ballots received within 6 days after the election as provided under this subsection to the clerk of the county in which the city or township is located. If the postmark on the absent voter ballot return envelope is missing or unclear, and if the county clerk determines that the absent voter ballot return envelope or the voter certificate inside the absent voter ballot return envelope is dated on or before election day by the absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter, the county clerk shall consider that absent voter ballot as timely received. The absent voter ballots considered timely received as provided under this subsection shall be tabulated by the county clerk in a meeting of the board of county canvassers. As used in this subsection, "postmark" means any type of mark applied by the United States Postal Service or any delivery service to the absent voter ballot return envelope, including, but not limited to, a bar code or any tracking marks that indicate when a ballot was mailed. (19) As used in this section: (a) "Absent uniformed services voter" means any of the following: (i) A member of a uniformed service on active duty who, by reason of being on active duty, is absent from the place of residence where the member is otherwise qualified to vote. (ii) A member of the merchant marine who, by reason of service in the merchant marine, is absent from the place of residence where the member is otherwise qualified to vote. (iii) A spouse or dependent of a member referred to in subparagraph (i) or (ii) who, by reason of the active duty or service of the member, is absent from the place of residence where the spouse or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) "Member of the merchant marine" means an individual, other than a member of a uniformed service or an individual employed, enrolled, or maintained on the Great Lakes or the inland waterways, who is either of the following: (i) Employed as an officer or crew member of a vessel documented under the laws of the United States, a vessel owned by the United States, or a vessel of foreign-flag registry under charter to or control of the United States. (ii) Enrolled with the United States for employment or training for employment, or maintained by the United States for emergency relief service, as an officer or crew member of a vessel documented under the laws of the United States, a vessel owned by the United States, or a vessel of foreign-flag registry under charter to or control of the United States. (c) "Overseas voter" means any of the following: (i) An absent uniformed services voter who, by reason of active duty or service, is absent from the United States on the date of an election. (ii) An individual who resides outside of the United States and is qualified to vote in the last place in which the individual was domiciled before leaving the United States. (iii) An individual who resides outside of the United States and who, but for such residence outside of the United States, would be qualified to vote in the last place in which the individual was domiciled before leaving the United States. (d) "Uniformed services" means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard, the Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service, the Commissioned Corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, a reserve 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 component of a uniformed service, or the Michigan National Guard as that term is defined in section 105 of the Michigan military act, 1967 PA 150, MCL 32.505. Sec. 761. (1) If the clerk of a city or township receives an application for an absent voter ballot, the clerk must immediately determine if the applicant is registered to vote in that city or township, if the applicant is qualified to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, and if the signature on the application agrees sufficiently with the signature on file for the individual as required in subsection (2). The clerk must immediately, upon verification of the application or, if the application is received and verified before the printing of the absent voter ballots, as soon as the absent voter ballots are received by the clerk, forward by mail, postage prepaid, or deliver the absent voter ballot to the applicant. The clerk must include with the absent voter ballot a postage prepaid absent voter ballot return envelope. A clerk shall not send an absent voter ballot to an applicant by first-class mail after 5 p.m. on the fourth day before an election. If the clerk of a city or township receives an application for an absent voter ballot from an applicant who is a program participant, as that term is defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853, then the city or township clerk shall mail an absent voter ballot to that program participant at the designated address provided to that program participant by the department of the attorney general under the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.851 to 780.873. If the clerk of a city or township receives an absent voter ballot application after the deadline for a clerk to mail an absent voter ballot by first-class mail to the applicant under this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection, and the clerk does not otherwise promptly provide the applicant with the absent voter ballot, the clerk must immediately notify the applicant that the applicant's absent voter ballot application was rejected as not timely received and notify the applicant of the alternative methods of voting available for that election. The clerk must notify the applicant by telephone, email, or text message, if available. In the absence of the applicant's telephone number or email address, the clerk must notify the applicant by United States mail. The clerk may also provide notice to the applicant by any other available methods of contact. Electronic notification of the rejection of the application under section 764c that provides the information required by this subsection constitutes sufficient notification to the applicant. However, an absent voter ballot application that is rejected must still be processed for any future elections indicated on that absent voter ballot application. If a county clerk receives an application for an absent voter ballot from an individual, the county clerk shall immediately forward that absent voter ballot application to the appropriate city or township clerk where that individual resides. If a city or township clerk receives an application for an absent voter ballot from an individual who is registered to vote in a different city or township, that clerk must immediately contact the individual to determine where the individual resides and should be registered to vote. If the city or township clerk determines that the individual is registered to vote in a different city or township, the city or township clerk must electronically forward the application to the clerk of the city or township in which the individual is registered. (2) The signature on file must be used to determine the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 genuineness of a signature on an application for an absent voter ballot. Signature comparisons must be made using the procedures required under section 766a. If the clerk of a city or township rejects an absent voter ballot application because the signature on the absent voter ballot application does not agree sufficiently with the signature on file or because the elector failed to sign the absent voter ballot application, the applicant must be provided notice and the opportunity to cure the deficiency as provided under section 766a. The notice must inform the applicant that the applicant must cure the deficiency by 4 p.m. on the fourth day before the election in order to receive an absent voter ballot by first-class mail. If the applicant cures the deficiency as provided under section 766a by 4 p.m. on the fourth day before the election, the clerk must immediately send an absent voter ballot and a postage prepaid absent voter ballot return envelope to the applicant as provided under subsection (1). (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, and except for ballots delivered pursuant to an emergency absent voter ballot application under section 759b, absent voter ballots must be mailed or delivered to the applicant at the applicant's registration address unless the applicant requests that the absent voter ballot be sent to a different address as provided on the applicant's absent voter ballot application. In addition, a clerk may mail or deliver an absent voter ballot, on request of the applicant, to a post office box if the post office box is where the applicant normally receives personal mail and the applicant does not receive mail at the applicant's registration address. Subject to subsections (6) and (7), an absent voter ballot may be delivered to an applicant in person at the clerk's office. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) The clerk shall enclose with the ballot a postage prepaid return envelope properly addressed to the clerk and bearing on the back of the return envelope a printed statement in substantially the following form: TO BE COMPLETED BY THE CLERK ___________________________ ___________________________ Name of Voter Street Address or R.R. or Program Participant Identification Number ___________________________ ___________________________ City or Township County Ward ______ Precinct ______ Date of Election _____________ ================================================================== TO BE COMPLETED BY THE ABSENT VOTER I assert that I am a United States citizen and a registered elector of the city or township named above. I am voting as an absent voter in conformity with state election law. Unless otherwise indicated below, I personally marked the ballot enclosed in this envelope without exhibiting it to any other individual. I further assert that this absent voter ballot is being returned to the clerk or an assistant of the clerk by me personally; by public postal service, express mail service, parcel post service, or other common carrier; by a member of my immediate family; or by an individual residing in my household. DATE:______________ SIGN HERE X_____________________________ Signature of Absent Voter The above form must be signed or your vote may not be counted. AN ABSENT VOTER WHO KNOWINGLY MAKES A FALSE STATEMENT IS GUILTY 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 OF A MISDEMEANOR. ================================================================== TO BE COMPLETED ONLY IF VOTER IS ASSISTED IN VOTING BY ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL I assisted the above named absent voter who is disabled or otherwise unable to mark the ballot in marking the absent voter's absent voter ballot pursuant to the absent voter's directions. The absent voter ballot was inserted in the return envelope without being exhibited to any other individual. ____________________ ____________________ ____________________ Signature of Individual Street Address City or Township Assisting Voter or R.R. ________________________________________________________________ Printed Name of Individual Assisting Voter AN INDIVIDUAL WHO ASSISTS AN ABSENT VOTER AND WHO KNOWINGLY MAKES A FALSE STATEMENT IS GUILTY OF A FELONY. ================================================================== WARNING INDIVIDUALS WHO CAN LEGALLY BE IN POSSESSION OF AN ABSENT VOTER BALLOT ISSUED TO AN ABSENT VOTER ARE LIMITED TO THE ABSENT VOTER; AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE ABSENT VOTER'S IMMEDIATE FAMILY OR RESIDES IN THE ABSENT VOTER'S HOUSEHOLD AND WHO HAS BEEN ASKED BY THE ABSENT VOTER TO RETURN THE BALLOT; AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE JOB IT IS TO HANDLE MAIL BEFORE, DURING, OR AFTER BEING TRANSPORTED BY A PUBLIC POSTAL SERVICE, EXPRESS MAIL SERVICE, PARCEL POST SERVICE, OR COMMON CARRIER, BUT ONLY DURING THE NORMAL COURSE OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S EMPLOYMENT; AND THE CLERK, ASSISTANTS OF THE CLERK, AND OTHER AUTHORIZED ELECTION OFFICIALS OF THE CITY OR 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 TOWNSHIP. ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL IN POSSESSION OF AN ABSENT VOTER BALLOT IS GUILTY OF A FELONY. (5) An absent voter who knowingly makes a false statement on the absent voter ballot return envelope is guilty of a misdemeanor. An individual who assists an absent voter and who knowingly makes a false statement on the absent voter ballot return envelope is guilty of a felony. (6) If an elector who qualifies to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, applies for an absent voter ballot in person at a clerk's office before 4 p.m. on the day before election day, the city or township clerk shall not issue an absent voter ballot to that elector until the elector presents identification for election purposes. If an elector does not have identification for election purposes, the clerk shall inform the elector that the elector must sign an affidavit to that effect in front of the clerk before an absent voter ballot will be issued in person to that elector. If an elector signs an affidavit under this subsection, the clerk shall issue an absent voter ballot to that elector. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and subsection (7), a clerk shall not issue an absent voter ballot in person to any elector after 4 p.m. on the day before election day. An elector who qualifies to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, and who is in line at 4 p.m. on the day before election day must be issued an absent voter ballot. This subsection also applies to an individual who submits an absent voter ballot application by means other than in person at a clerk's office, but who receives that individual's absent voter ballot in the clerk's office. (7) An individual who registers to vote or who updates the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 individual's voter registration on election day in accordance with section 497 may, if qualified to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, apply for and complete an absent voter ballot in person at a clerk's office on election day. The individual shall receive the absent voter ballot, mark the absent voter ballot in a clerk's office, and return the absent voter ballot to the clerk in the absent voter ballot return envelope. An individual who is in line to register to vote or to update the individual's voter registration at 8 p.m. on election day must be permitted to register to vote or update the individual's voter registration, apply, if qualified to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, for an absent voter ballot, and vote the absent voter ballot after 8 p.m., including after 11:59 p.m. on election day if necessary. An individual who registers to vote on election day and who is in line to apply for an absent voter ballot at 8 p.m. on election day must, if qualified to vote as an absent voter, as that term is defined in section 758, be permitted to apply for an absent voter ballot and vote the absent voter ballot after 8 p.m., including after 11:59 p.m. on election day if necessary. Enacting section 1. Sections 6, 759e, 759f, and 759g of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.6, 168.759e, 168.759f, and 168.759g, are repealed.